District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

34-1205

Establishment of Office of Cable Television and Telecommunications; appointment of Executive Director.

Repealed.

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 6, 29 DCR 2872
Oct. 22, 1983, D.C. Law 5-36, § 2(l), 30 DCR 4289
June 1, 1984, D.C. Law 5-85, § 2(a), 31 DCR 1864
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-210, § 2(e), 43 DCR 4702
May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-98, § 2, 47 DCR 789
Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 3, 49 DCR 7334
1981 Ed., § 43-1804.
1981 Ed., § 43-1805.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Office of Cable Television and Telecommunications Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-31, October 8, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 8696).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 3 of Cable Television Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-409, July 15, 2002, 49 DCR 7280).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 3 of Cable Television Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-409, July 15, 2002, 49 DCR 7280).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Office of Cable Television and Telecommunications Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-74, May 26, 1999, 46 DCR 5168).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Office of Cable Television and Telecommunications Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-121, July 28, 1999, 46 DCR 6594).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 3 of Cable Television Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-409, July 15, 2002, 49 DCR 7280).